Nevada, session 83, SB180.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 706.291 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.291 1. [The] Except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, the Authority shall require every fully regulated carrier
and every operator of a tow car, within such time and in such
amounts as the Authority may designate, to file with the Authority
in a form required and approved by the Authority a liability
insurance policy, or a certificate of insurance in lieu thereof, or a
bond of a surety company, or other surety, in such reasonable sum
as the Authority may deem necessary to protect adequately the
interests of the public. The Authority shall require every fully
regulated carrier which is authorized to transport only freight to
file with the Authority in a form required and approved by the
Authority a liability insurance policy, or a certificate of insurance
in lieu thereof, or a bond of a surety company, or other surety:
(a) On or after January 1, 2026, in an amount not less than
$1,000,000;
(b) On or after January 1, 2028, in an amount not less than
$1,250,000; and
(c) On or after January 1, 2030, in an amount not less than
$1,500,000.
2. [The] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
Department shall require every other common and contract motor
carrier and every private carrier, within such time and in such
amounts as the Department may designate, to file with the
Department in a form required and approved by the Department a
liability insurance policy, or a certificate of insurance in lieu thereof,
a bond of a surety company, or other surety, in such reasonable sum
as the Department may deem necessary to protect adequately the
interests of the public. In determining the amount of liability
insurance or other surety required of a carrier pursuant to this
subsection, the Department shall [create] :
(a) Create a separate category for vehicles with a
manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of less than 26,000
pounds and impose a lesser requirement with respect to such
vehicles [.] ; and
(b) Require every other common and contract motor carrier
and every private carrier which is authorized to transport
intrastate-only freight by the category of vehicles with a
manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of 26,000 pounds or
more to file with the Department in a form required and approved
by the Department a liability insurance policy, or a certificate of
-
*SB180_R1*

– 3 –
insurance in lieu thereof, or a bond of a surety company, or other
surety:
(1) On or after January 1, 2026, in an amount not less than
$1,000,000;
(2) On or after January 1, 2028, in an amount not less than
$1,250,000; and
(3) On or after January 1, 2030, in an amount not less than
$1,500,000.
3. The liability insurance policy or certificate, policy or bond
of a surety company or other surety must bind the obligors
thereunder to pay the compensation for injuries to persons or for
loss or damage to property resulting from the negligent operation of
the carrier.
4. The Authority and the Department may jointly prescribe by
regulation the respective amounts and forms required by subsections
1 and 2.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective:
1. Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
2. On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB180_R1*